Washington statutes.
RCW 19.142.070

Surety bond in lieu of trust account.

The requirements of RCW 19.142.060 do not apply to any health studios which, prior to any preopening sales, have provided a bond guaranteeing the completion or opening of any facility for which contracts for health studio services were sold prior to the opening of the facility. The bond shall be drawn upon a surety in the amount of one hundred fifty thousand dollars, running to the state of Washington. An action on the bond may be brought by the office of the attorney general or by any buyer of a contract for health studio services sold prior to the opening of the facility.

[ 1987 c 317 s 8.]